Washington statutes.
RCW 6.21.050

Time and place of sale—Postponements.

(1) All sales of property under execution, order of sale, or decree, shall be made by auction between nine o'clock in the morning and four o'clock in the afternoon. Sale of a public franchise under execution or order of sale on foreclosure must be made at the front door of the courthouse in the county in which the franchise was granted or by public auction sale by electronic media. Sales of real property shall be made at the courthouse door or by public auction sale by electronic media on Friday unless Friday is a legal holiday and then the sale shall be held on the next following regular business day.

(2) If at the time appointed for the sale the sheriff is prevented from attending at the place appointed or, being present, should deem it for the advantage of all concerned to postpone the sale for want of purchasers, or other sufficient cause, the sheriff may postpone the sale not exceeding one week next after the day appointed, and so from time to time for the like cause, giving notice of every adjournment by public proclamation made at the same time, and by posting written notices of such adjournment under the notices of sale originally posted. The sheriff for like causes may also adjourn the sale from time to time, not exceeding thirty days beyond the day at which the writ is made returnable, with the consent of the plaintiff indorsed upon the writ.

[ 2021 c 122 s 12; 1987 c 442 s 605; 1953 c 126 s 1; 1899 c 53 s 4; 1897 c 50 s 2; RRS s 583. Formerly RCW 6.24.020.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2021 c 122: See note following RCW 2.32.050.